src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.xfst.yaml
  Noun - bassengráddje : # MUORRA
    bassæŋŋa+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp#ráddje+N+NomAg+Sg+Nom: [bassengráddje, bassängráddje]
    bassæŋŋa+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp#ráddje+N+NomAg+Sg+Ine: [bassengráddjen, bassängráddjen]
    bassæŋŋa+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp#ráddje+N+NomAg+Sg+Ill: [bassengráddjáj, bassängráddjáj]
    bassæŋŋa+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ráddje+N+NomAg+Sg+Nom: [basseng-ráddje, bassäng-ráddje]
    bassæŋŋa+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ráddje+N+NomAg+Sg+Ine: [basseng-ráddjen, bassäng-ráddjen]
    bassæŋŋa+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ráddje+N+NomAg+Sg+Ill: [basseng-ráddjáj, bassäng-ráddjáj]

  Noun - budsjettdiedádus: # GÅNÅGIS
    budsjæhtta+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Nom: [budsjettdiedádus, budgetdiedádus]
    budsjæhtta+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Ine: [budsjettdiedádusán, budgetdiedádusán]
    budsjæhtta+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Ill: [budsjettdiedádussaj, budgetdiedádussaj]
    budsjæhtta+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Nom: [budsjett-diedádus, budget-diedádus]
    budsjæhtta+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Ine: [budsjett-diedádusán, budget-diedádusán]
    budsjæhtta+N+Cmp/Unass+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#diedádus+N+Sg+Ill: [budsjett-diedádussaj, budget-diedádussaj]

    

  Noun - tjáppisgiedjek: # GAHPER
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjek
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Gen: tjáhppisgiedjega
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Acc: tjáhppisgiedjegav 
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ine: tjáhppisgiedjegin 
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ill: tjáhppisgiedjegij 
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ela: tjáhppisgiedjegis 
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Com: tjáhppisgiedjegijn
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjega
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Gen: tjáhppisgiedjegij 
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Acc: tjáhppisgiedjegijt
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ine: tjáhppisgiedjegijn
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ill: tjáhppisgiedjegijda
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ela: tjáhppisgiedjegijs
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Com: tjáhppisgiedjegij
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Ess: tjáhppisgiedjegin
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjegasj
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjegattjasj
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhppisgiedjegahtes
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Abe: [tjáhppisgiedjegahtá, tjáhppisgiedjegahti]
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppis-giedjek
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Gen: tjáhppis-giedjega
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Acc: tjáhppis-giedjegav
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ine: tjáhppis-giedjegin
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ill: tjáhppis-giedjegij
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ela: tjáhppis-giedjegis
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Com: tjáhppis-giedjegijn
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Nom: tjáhppis-giedjega
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Gen: tjáhppis-giedjegij
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Acc: tjáhppis-giedjegijt
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ine: tjáhppis-giedjegijn
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ill: tjáhppis-giedjegijda
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ela: tjáhppis-giedjegijs
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Com: tjáhppis-giedjegij
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Ess: tjáhppis-giedjegin
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppis-giedjegasj
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjáhppis-giedjegattjasj
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhppis-giedjegahtes
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhppat+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giedjek+N+Abe: [tjáhppis-giedjegahtá, tjáhppis-giedjegahti]

  Noun - tjehpudakmihtto : # MUORRA
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Long+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Nom: tjehpudahkamihtto
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Nom: tjehpudakmihtto
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Long+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ine: tjehpudahkamihton
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ine: tjehpudakmihton
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Long+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ill: tjehpudahkamihttuj
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ill: tjehpudakmihttuj
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Long+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Nom: tjehpudahka-mihtto
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Nom: tjehpudak-mihtto
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Long+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ine: tjehpudahka-mihton
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ine: tjehpudak-mihton
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Long+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ill: tjehpudahka-mihttuj
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ill: tjehpudak-mihttuj

  Noun - viedtjamulmusj : #
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Nom: viedtjamulmusj
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Ine: viedtjamulmutjin
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Ill: viedtjamulmutjij
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Nom: viedtjam-ulmusj
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Ine: viedtjam-ulmutjin
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Ill: viedtjam-ulmutjij


  Noun - uksagiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom:  uksagiehtje
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine:  uksagietjen
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uksagæhtjáj, uksagähtjáj]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom:  uksa-giehtje
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine:  uksa-gietjen
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uksa-gæhtjáj, uksa-gähtjáj]


  Noun - uvsagiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom:  uvsagiehtje
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine:  uvsagietjen
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uvsagæhtjáj, uvsagähtjáj]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom:  uvsa-giehtje
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine:  uvsa-gietjen
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uvsa-gæhtjáj, uvsa-gähtjáj]


  Noun - uvsajgiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom:  uvsajgiehtje
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine:  uvsajgietjen
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uvsajgæhtjáj, uvsajgähtjáj]
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom:  uvsaj-giehtje
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine:  uvsaj-gietjen
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uvsaj-gæhtjáj, uvsaj-gähtjáj]

  Noun - nijbbedille : # MUORRA +Cmp/SgNom
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbbedille
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbbedilen
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbbedilláj
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbbe-dille
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbbe-dilen
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbbe-dilláj

  Noun - nijbedille : # MUORRA +Cmp/SgGen
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbedille
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbedilen
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbedilláj
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbe-dille
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbe-dilen
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbe-dilláj

  Noun - nijbijdille : # MUORRA +Cmp/PlGen
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbijdille
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbijdilen
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbijdilláj
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: nijbij-dille
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: nijbij-dilen
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: nijbij-dilláj

  Noun - gånågiskråvnnå : # GÅNÅGIS
    gånågis+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#kråvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: gånågiskråvnnå
    gånågis+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#kråvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: gånågisákråvnnå
    gånågis+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#kråvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: gånågisájkråvnnå

  Num + nounder-adj : # NUM
    lågenanakta+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#jahke+N+Der/k+A+Sg+Nom: [lågenanavtajagák, lågenanåvtåjagák]

  Noun - rásstátjivgga : # MUORRA +Cmp/SgGen
    rástes+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#tjivgga+N+Sg+Nom: rásstátjivgga
    rástes+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#tjivgga+N+Sg+Ine: rásstátjivgan
    rástes+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#tjivgga+N+Sg+Ill: rásstátjivggaj
    rástes+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#tjivgga+N+Sg+Nom: rásstájtjivgga
    
  Noun - svállásnuolgga : # MUORRA +Cmp/SgGen
    sváles+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#snuolgga+N+Sg+Nom: svállásnuolgga
    sváles+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#snuolgga+N+Sg+Ine: svállásnuolgan
    sváles+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#snuolgga+N+Sg+Ill: svállásnuolggaj
    sváles+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#snuolgga+N+Sg+Nom: svállájsnuolgga

  Noun - suollugiehtje : # MUORRA +Cmp/SgGen
    suoloj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom: suollugiehtje
    suoloj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine: suollugietjen
    suoloj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [suollugæhtjáj, suollugähtjáj]

  Noun - boahttsubierggo : # MUORRA +Cmp/SgGen
    boatsoj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#bierggo+N+Sg+Nom: boahttsubierggo
    boatsoj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#bierggo+N+Sg+Ine: boahttsubiergon
    boatsoj+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#bierggo+N+Sg+Ill: boahttsubiergguj

  Noun - gåhkkåfiekse : # MUORRA +Cmp/SgGen
    gåhkes+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#fiekse+N+Sg+Nom: gåhkkåfiekse
    gåhkes+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#fiekse+N+Sg+Ine: gåhkkåfievsen
    gåhkes+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#fiekse+N+Sg+Ill: [gåhkkåfæksáj, gåhkkåfäksáj]

  Noun - gisstábielle : # MUORRA +Cmp/SgGen
    gistá+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#bielle+N+Sg+Nom: gisstábielle
    gistá+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#bielle+N+Sg+Ine: gisstábielen
    gistá+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#bielle+N+Sg+Ill: [gisstábælláj, gisstábälláj]

  Noun - Gáddjárávkke : # MUORRA 
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#rávkke+N+Sg+Nom: Gáddjárávkke
    

  Adjective - Gáddjánamák : # MUORRA 
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#námak+A+Sg+Nom: Gáddjánamák
